trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>

<!-- pq faci make-->

<dictionary>
<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭ</alphabet>

<sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="nomiacc"/>
    <sdef n="nomi"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>    
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="gerpast"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pp2"/>
    <sdef n="pp3"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>

    <pardef n="adiós__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<pardef n="guionet">

    
                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="coma">

    
                              <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="cometa">

    
                              <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="numeros">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="separa">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


     <pardef n="separ">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="paresq">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="pardret">

    
                              <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>



<!-- Paradigma ADJ -->


 
  <pardef n="adj__adjINICIAL">

      <e>
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>j</l>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>


      <e>
      <p>
         <l>n</l>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>jn</l>
         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>


  <pardef n="adj__adj">

      <e>
      <p>
         <l>a</l>
         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>aj</l>
         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>


      <e>
      <p>
         <l>an</l>
         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>ajn</l>
         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>a<s n="adv"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>



 <pardef n="maybe__adv">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="very__preadv">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="where__adv">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ke__cnjsub">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>









   <pardef n="the__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>



    <pardef n="a__det">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="another__det">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="other__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                             <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="several__det">

                              <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>




    <pardef n="her__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="inercia"><i>inerci</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="reciproka"><i>reciprok</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tia"><i>ti</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="miksrasa"><i>miksras</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="impulsiĝema"><i>impulsiĝem</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="malfacila"><i>malfacil</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tolerema"><i>tolerem</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enuiga"><i>enuig</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vertiĝodona"><i>vertiĝodon</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fetora"><i>fetor</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pola"><i>pol</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="multe pli"><i>multe<b/>pli</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ne tre"><i>ne<b/>tre</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="tre"><i>multe</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ne multe"><i>ne<b/>multe</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="sufiĉe"><i>sufiĉe</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="iom"><i>iom</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="neniom"><i>neniom</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="tute ne"><i>tute<b/>ne</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="pli"><i>pli</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="malpli"><i>malpli</i><par n="very__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="post nelonge"><i>post<b/>nelonge</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="periode"><i>periode</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="por ke"><i>por<b/>ke</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="kvazaŭ"><i>kvazaŭ</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="kiam"><i>kiam</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="same kiel"><i>same<b/>kiel</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="se nur"><i>se<b/>nur</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="post kiam"><i>post<b/>kiam</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="eĉ se nur malmulte"><i>eĉ<b/>se<b/>nur<b/>malmulte</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ol"><i>ol</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="kiel"><i>kiel</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="pro tio ke"><i>pro<b/>tio<b/>ke</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="ke__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="por"><i>ciufoje<b/>kiam</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ol"><i>ol</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="pro tio ke"><i>pro<b/>tio<b/>ke</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="ke__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="pere"><i>pere</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="strange"><i>strange</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nuntempe"><i>nuntempe</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="en la mezo"><i>en<b/>la<b/>mezo</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="senŝerce sed"><i>senŝerce<b/>sed</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ekologie"><i>ekologie</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="numere"><i>numere</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="maksimume"><i>maksimume</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kaj"><i>kaj</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="aŭ"><i>aŭ</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="nek"><i>nek</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="adiaŭ"><i>adiaŭ</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="sufiĉas"><i>sufiĉas</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="imagu"><i>imagu</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ne plu trompu"><i>ne<b/>plu<b/>trompu</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bonan matenon"><i>bonan<b/>matenon</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kojonoj"><i>kojonoj</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="he"><i>he</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis poste"><i>ĝis<b/>poste</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="saluton"><i>saluton</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kia embaraso"><i>kia<b/>embaraso</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ho Dio"><i>ho<b/>Dio</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
                              <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="cometa"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
                              <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
